Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.465

Dissenter's estimate of fair value—Notice.

(1) A dissenting partner may notify the partnership in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's interest in the partnership, and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate, less any payment under RCW 25.05.460, if:

(a) The dissenter believes that the amount paid is less than the fair value of the dissenter's interest in the partnership, or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

(b) The partnership fails to make payment within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment; or

(c) The partnership, having failed to effectuate the proposed merger, does not release the transfer restrictions imposed on the partners' interests as permitted by RCW 25.05.450 within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment.

(2) A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the partnership of the dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after the partnership made payment for the dissenter's interest in the partnership.

[ 1998 c 103 s 1010.]